Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 5. Special Elections.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5A M.J. Counties, §§ 13, 14, 40, 71.

§ 24.2-681.
How special elections superintended and determined.

All special elections shall be superintended and held, notice thereof given, ballots prepared, returns made and certified, votes canvassed, results ascertained and made known, and certificates of election given, by the same officers, under the same penalties, and subject to the same regulations as prescribed for general elections, except as otherwise provided by law.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-140; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-164; 1973, c. 30; 1993, c. 641.

Cross references.

As to election procedure for local government charters, see §

15.2-201

.

As to special election on offering of cable television service by municipality, see §

15.2-2108.8

.

§ 24.2-682.
Times for special elections.

Notwithstanding any charter or special act to the contrary, the following provisions govern the times for holding special elections. Every special election shall be held on a Tuesday. No special election shall be held within the 55 days prior to a general or primary election. No special election shall be held on the same day as a primary election. A special election may be held on the same day as a general election.

A referendum election shall be ordered at least 81 days prior to the date for which the referendum election is called.

A special election to fill a vacancy in any constitutional office shall be held promptly and in accordance with the requirements of subsection A.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-44, 24-136, 24-137, 24-138, 24-139, 24-141, 24-346; 1956, c. 378; 1966, c. 115; 1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-1(5)(c), 24.1-163, 24.1-165; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 119; 1972, c. 620; 1973, c. 30; 1974, c. 428; 1975, c. 515; 1976, c. 616; 1977, c. 30; 1978, cc. 258, 304, 778; 1979, c. 37; 1980, c. 639; 1981, c. 367; 1982, cc. 498, 650; 1983, c. 461; 1989, c. 322; 1991, c. 592; 1991, 1st Sp. Sess., c. 12; 1993, c. 641; 2000, cc. 787, 1070; 2008, cc. 107, 385; 2010, cc. 431, 542.

Cross references.

As to issuance of writs of election to fill vacancies in the General Assembly, see Va. Const., Art. IV, § 7.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 787 and 1070, effective October 1, 2000, are identical, and in subsection C, deleted “or in any constitutional office” preceding “regularly elected” in the first sentence; and added the second paragraph.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 107 and 385 are identical, and substituted “55 days” for “sixty days” in the third sentence of subsection A.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 431 deleted the first paragraph of subsection C, which read: “A special election to fill a vacancy in any county, city, or town office, including school board member, regularly elected in a November general election, shall be held on a November general election day. A special election to fill a vacancy in any city or town office, including school board member, regularly elected in a May general election, shall be held on a regular May general election day.”

The 2010 amendment by c. 542 substituted “81” for “sixty” in subsection B.

§ 24.2-683.
Writ for special election to fill a vacancy.

Whenever the Governor, Speaker of the House, President pro tempore of the Senate, or either house of the General Assembly orders a special election, he, or the person designated to act for the house, shall issue a writ of election designating the office to be filled at the election and the time to hold the election. He shall transmit the writ to the secretary of the electoral board and the general registrar of each county or city in which the election is to be held. Each general registrar shall post a copy of the writ on the official website for the county or city or at not less than 10 public places or have notice of the election published once in a newspaper of general circulation in his jurisdiction at least 10 days before the election. If the special election is held in more than one county or city, the general registrars may act jointly to have the notice published once before the election in the affected jurisdictions.

Whenever a special election is ordered to fill a vacancy otherwise than under the preceding paragraph, the officer ordering the election shall issue his writ of election at the time the vacancy occurs, designating the office to be filled at the election and the time and place to hold the election. He shall direct and transmit the writ to the secretary of the electoral board and the general registrar of each county or city in which the election is to be held. The general registrar, or general registrars if the election will be held in more than one county or city, shall proceed to cause public notice to be given of the election in the same manner as is required in the preceding paragraph.

A copy of any order calling a special election to fill a vacancy shall be sent immediately to the State Board.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-138, 24-139; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-163; 1974, c. 428; 1975, c. 515; 1993, c. 641; 2003, c. 155; 2016, cc. 18, 492.

Cross references.

As to power of the Governor, the Senate and the House of Delegates to issue writs of election to fill vacancies in the General Assembly, see Va. Const., Art. IV, § 7.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 155 inserted “on the official website for the county or city” and twice substituted “10” for “ten” in the third sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 18 and 492 are identical, and twice inserted “and the general registrar” following “secretary of the electoral board” and twice substituted “general registrar” for “secretary” and “general registrars” for “secretaries.”

Law Review.

For survey of election law reform in Virginia, see 12 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 333 (1970).

§ 24.2-684.
How referendum elections called and held, and the results ascertained and certified.

Notwithstanding any other provision of any law or charter to the contrary, the provisions of this section shall govern all referenda.

No referendum shall be placed on the ballot unless specifically authorized by statute or by charter.

Whenever any question is to be submitted to the voters of any county, city, town, or other local subdivision, the referendum shall in every case be held pursuant to a court order as provided in this section. The court order calling a referendum shall state the question to appear on the ballot in plain English as that term is defined in §

24.2-687

. The order shall be entered and the election held within a reasonable period of time subsequent to the receipt of the request for the referendum if the request is found to be in proper order. The court order shall set the date for the referendum in conformity with the requirements of §

24.2-682

.

A copy of the court order calling a referendum shall be sent immediately to the State Board by the clerk of the court in which the order was issued.

The ballot shall be prepared by the appropriate general registrar and distributed to the appropriate precincts. On the day fixed for the referendum, the regular election officers shall open the polls and take the sense of the qualified voters of the county, city, town, or other local subdivision, as the case may be, on the question so submitted. The ballots for use at any such election shall be printed to state the question as follows:

“(Here state briefly the question submitted)

• Yes

• No”

The ballots shall be printed, marked, and counted and returns made and canvassed as in other elections. The results shall be certified by the secretary of the appropriate electoral board to the State Board, to the court ordering the election, and to such other authority as may be proper to accomplish the purpose of the election.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-141; 1966, c. 115; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-165; 1974, c. 428; 1975, c. 515; 1976, c. 616; 1978, cc. 258, 304; 1979, c. 37; 1980, c. 639; 1981, c. 367; 1982, cc. 498, 650; 1983, c. 461; 1991, c. 592; 1993, c. 641; 1994, c. 142; 1996, c. 297; 2016, cc. 18, 492.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 18 and 492 are identical, and substituted “general registrar” for “electoral board” in the fifth paragraph.

§ 24.2-684.1.
Requirements for voter petitions to call for referendum elections.

In addition to other applicable requirements of law, the following requirements shall apply whenever a referendum election is initiated by voter petitions. The requirements of this section shall be construed to override any requirement of general or special law in conflict with this section, except requirements set out in charter provisions to govern the exercise of recall, initiative, or referendum powers in a county, city, or town.

The requirements of this section shall apply to petitions calling for any referendum which is ordered to be held on or after January 1, 1994.

Prior to circulating any petition for signature, an individual shall file a copy of the petition with the clerk of the circuit court for the county or city in which the referendum will be held. The individual shall be a qualified voter of the county or city and shall file, with the petition copy, a statement giving his name; residence address and, if different, his mailing address; and the name of the organization, if any, which he represents in circulating the petition. The copy of the petition shall be filed on or after the effective date of the law which authorizes the referendum for which the petition will be circulated. The clerk shall certify, within 10 days of such filing, that he has received and accepted the petition copy and statement.

If the referendum will be held only in a town, the copy and statement shall be filed with the clerk of the circuit court for the county in which the town, or larger portion of the town, is located, and the individual shall be a qualified voter of the town. If the referendum will be held only in part of a county, city, or town, the copy and statement shall be filed with the clerk of the appropriate circuit court, and the individual shall be a qualified voter of the part of the county, city, or town in which the referendum will be held. If the referendum will be held in more than one county, city, or town, the copy and statement shall be filed with the clerk of the circuit court of any one of the localities in which the referendum will be held, and the individual shall be a qualified voter of that locality.

Each qualified voter signing a petition shall date his signature.

Each such voter may provide on the petition the last four digits of his social security number, if any; however, noncompliance with this requirement shall not be cause to invalidate the voter’s signature on the petition.

Each signature on the petition shall be witnessed by a person who is qualified to vote, or qualified to register to vote, in the referendum for which he is circulating the petition and whose affidavit to that effect, including his name, residence address and, if different, his mailing address, and the name of the organization, if any, that he represents in circulating the petition, appears on each page, front and back, of the petition.

The petition shall be circulated, completed, and filed with the appropriate court or authority within nine months of the date of the certification by the clerk of the circuit court pursuant to subdivision 1.

Each qualified voter signing the petition shall have been validly registered in the jurisdiction for which the petition is circulated at the time of signing the petition and at the time of validating the petition signatures.

The number of voters registered on January 1 of the year of the certification by the clerk of the circuit court pursuant to subdivision 1 shall be the basis for determining the number of signatures required on the petition in all cases in which the law authorizing the referendum provides that the number of signatures required for the petition is a percentage of the number of registered voters.

If the court or authority finds that the filed petitions are valid and sufficient under law, it shall proceed, as provided by law, to order or call for the referendum election. If the court or authority finds that the filed petitions are invalid for any cause, the petitions and the signatures on them shall be invalid for all purposes. The invalidity of one or more signatures on a petition page shall not be cause to invalidate the entire petition page. If the circulators of the petitions fail to file within the nine-month period provided in subdivision 6, the petitions and the signatures on them shall be invalid for all purposes.

History.

1993, c. 996, § 24.1-165.3; 1993, c. 641; 2000, cc. 232, 252; 2011, cc. 333, 520.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 996 enacted former § 24.1-165.3, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 1993, c. 641, cl. 6, effect has been given to this section, as set out above.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, Item 86 K, as added by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides:

“K.1 Notwithstanding Virginia Code §§

24.2-506

,

24.2-521

, and

24.2-684.1

, during a state of emergency as declared by the Governor due to the novel coronavirus (COVID-19) during 2021, any candidate for nomination by primary or any candidate for any office, other than a party nominee, may gather petition signatures as prescribed under Chapter 6 of Title 24.2 or by using the relevant form published by the Department of Elections as described under paragraph (2).

“2. For local offices, offices of the General Assembly, statewide offices, constitutional offices, and referenda, the Department of Elections will develop and publish, not later than March 1, 2021, forms to be used for petition circulation that permit a qualified petition signer to sign a petition while not in the presence of a petition circulator, provided that, in using the form, the petition signer must provide the following information:

“a. Affirmation that the signer is who they attest they are;

“b. Affirmation that the signer is a resident of their jurisdiction, including a statement of their address; and

“c. The last four digits of the signer’s social security number.

“3. If an individual signs a petition form published by the Department of Elections as described under paragraph (2), that individual shall transmit that form, either by mail, ITEM 86. electronically, or physically, to the candidate, the candidate’s campaign, or the petition circulator.

“4. If a petition form is required to be submitted to the Chair or Chair of the several committees of the respective party of the candidate for whom the petition is signed, the candidate, the candidate’s campaign, or the appropriate petition circulator shall submit the petition forms as prescribed under Title 24.2 of the Virginia Code.

“5. If a petition form is required to be submitted to a general registrar, the candidate, the candidate’s campaign, or the appropriate petition circulator shall submit the petition forms as prescribed under Title 24.2 of the Virginia Code.

“6. If a petition form is required to be submitted to the State Board of Elections, the candidate, the candidate’s campaign, or the appropriate petition circulator shall submit the petition form to the State Board of Elections either by mail, electronically, or physically. Any such petition forms shall be required to be received by the State Board of Elections by the relevant deadline under Virginia Code Title 24.2.

“7. If a petition is required to be submitted to a court or other appropriate authority pursuant o Virginia Code §

24.2-684.1

, the individual circulating such petition shall submit the petition to the court or other appropriate authority as prescribed under Title 24.2 of the Virginia Code.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 232 and 252 are identical, and inserted “or qualified to register to vote” in subdivision 5.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 333 substituted “may provide on the petition the last four digits of his” for “shall provide on the petition his” in subdivision 4, substituted “including his name, residence address and, if different, his mailing address, and the name of the organization, if any, that he represents in circulating the petition, appears on each page, front and back, of the petition” for “appears on each page of the petition” in subdivision 5, and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2011 amendment by c. 520 substituted “may provide on the petition the last four digits of” for “shall provide on the petition” in subdivision 4.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Election Law and Government,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 119 (2011).

§ 24.2-685.
Special elections; request for abolition of constitutional offices.

The provisions of this section shall be applicable to the holding of any referendum, elsewhere authorized by law, on the abolition of any constitutional office conducted prior to a request for a special act of the General Assembly to abolish such office.

Notwithstanding any other provision of general law or any special act, no referendum subject to the provisions of this section shall be held unless:

Petitions are filed with the circuit court of the county or city requesting that a referendum be held to authorize a request for a special act on the abolition of the named office;

The petitions are signed by qualified voters of the county or city equal in number to 20 percent of the total vote cast in the county or city for presidential electors in the last preceding presidential election; and

The petitions are filed with the court within 90 days of the first signature on the petitions, and the petitions show the date each signature was affixed.

Upon filing of a valid petition, the court shall order the election and state the question to be placed on the ballot in its order. The court shall order the referendum to be held at the next general election for members of the governing body of the county or city held at least 81 days after the date of the order.

After a referendum is conducted pursuant to this section with respect to the abolition of a particular office, no other referendum with respect to the abolition of the same office shall be held in the same county or city pursuant to this section for a period of eight years.

No special act authorizing the abolition of any such office shall be considered by the General Assembly without court certification that a referendum has been conducted pursuant to this section and that a majority of the qualified voters voting thereon have approved the request for a special act.

History.

1985, c. 586, § 24.1-165.1; 1993, c. 641; 2011, c. 599.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 599 made minor stylistic changes in subdivisions B 2 and B 3; and substituted “81 days” for “sixty days” in subsection C.

§ 24.2-686.
Special elections; petition and referendum requirements; abolition of constitutional office by change in form of government.

The provisions of §

24.2-685

shall apply, mutatis mutandis, to any county seeking to change its form of government pursuant to Chapter 3 (§

15.2-300

et seq.) of Title 15.2 if the effect of such change in form would be the abolition of an existing office created pursuant to Section 4 of Article VII of the Constitution of Virginia. In such case, the circuit court may order a referendum under §

15.2-301

only if requested by a voter petition meeting the requirements of §

24.2-685

. In such case, a question in substantially the following form shall be listed first on the ballot and be followed by those provided in §

15.2-301

:

“Shall the County of . . . . . . . . be authorized to change its form of government to one which would eliminate the elected office(s) of . . . . . . ?”

An affirmative vote on the subsequent question or questions on the ballot shall be given effect only if a majority of those voting in the referendum have voted affirmatively on the first question to authorize such a change in the form of government.

History.

1995, cc. 761, 808, 825.

§ 24.2-687.
Authorization for distribution of information on referendum elections.

The governing body of any county, city or town may provide for the preparation and printing of an explanation for each referendum question to be submitted to the voters of the county, city or town to be distributed at the polling places on the day of the referendum election. The governing body may have the explanation published by paid advertisement in a newspaper with general circulation in the county, city or town one or more times preceding the referendum.The explanation shall contain the ballot question and a statement of not more than 500 words on the proposed question. The explanation shall be presented in plain English, shall be limited to a neutral explanation, and shall not present arguments by either proponents or opponents of the proposal. The attorney for the county, city or town or, if there is no county, city or town attorney, the attorney for the Commonwealth shall prepare the explanation. “Plain English” means written in nontechnical, readily understandable language using words of common everyday usage and avoiding legal terms and phrases or other terms and words of art whose usage or special meaning primarily is limited to a particular field or profession.If the referendum question involves the issuance of bonds by a locality, the locality shall provide for such printed explanation. The explanation shall (i) state the estimated maximum amount of the bonds proposed to be issued, and (ii) state the proposed use of the bond proceeds, and if there is more than one use, state the proposed uses for which more than 10 percent of the total bond proceeds is expected to be used.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit a county, city or town from disseminating other neutral materials or advertisements concerning issues of public concern that are the subject of a referendum; however, the materials or advertisements shall not advocate the passage or defeat of the referendum question.

This section shall not be applicable to statewide referenda.

Any failure to comply with the provisions of this section shall not affect the validity of the referendum.

History.

1996, c. 297; 2004, cc. 21, 399; 2006, c. 302; 2011, c. 590.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 21 and 399 are identical, and inserted the A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph, in subsection A, added “to be distributed at the polling places on the day of the referendum election” to the end of the first sentence, deleted the former second sentence, which read: “The explanation shall be made available at registration sites prior to the referendum, if practicable, and be posted at the polling places on the day of the election,” and substituted “one or more times” for “once preceding the final day for registration, if practicable, and once during the week” in the last sentence; inserted subsection B; and inserted the C and D designations at the beginning of the former third and fourth paragraphs.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 302, throughout the section, inserted “or town” following “city” and made a related change.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 590 added the last paragraph in subsection A.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Authority of local governments. —

Local governments have no authority to expend funds on advertising in support of, or in opposition to, a local or statewide referendum question; however, local governments may, consistent with the procedures detailed in this section, prepare and distribute a neutral, nonpartisan statement explaining a local referendum question. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Kevin G. Miller, Member, Senate of Virginia, 03-015 (3/27/03).

Enactment by County Board of Supervisors of tax approved by citizen referendum. —

The enactment by a County Board of Supervisors of a meals tax ordinance with a rate of 1% after voters of that county gave their approval to a meals tax at a higher rate by a referendum vote is a valid exercise of the statutory authority granted to the Board of Supervisors to levy a meals tax in an amount and on such terms as that governing body may by ordinance prescribe. See opinion of the Attorney General to Michael McHale Collins, Esq., Attorney for Bath County, Virginia, Collins & Hepler, PLC, 10-053, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 87 (12/27/10).